Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 4. Public Facility Life-Cycle Cost Analyses

Cross references. —

As to construction and supervision of public buildings generally, see art. 7, § 22, Wyo. Const.

§ 16-6-401.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

16-6-401

through

16-6-403

:

“Economic life” means the projected or anticipated useful life of a major facility as expressed by a term of years;

“Energy-consumption analysis” means the evaluation of all energy systems and components by demand and type of energy including the internal energy load imposed on a major facility by its occupants, equipment and components, and the external energy load imposed on a major facility by the climatic conditions of its location. The energy-consumption projections shall take into account daily and seasonal variations in energy system output during normal operations;

“Energy systems” means all utilities, including heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, lighting and the supplying of domestic hot water;

“Initial cost” means the monies required for the capital construction or renovation of a major facility;

“Life-cycle cost analysis” means a study to compute life-cycle costs, as required in this act [§§

16-6-401

through

16-6-403

];

“Life-cycle cost” means the cost of a major facility including its initial cost, the cost of the energy consumed over its economic life and the cost of its operation and maintenance;

“Major facility” means any publicly owned building having eighteen thousand (18,000) square feet or more of gross floor area;

“Public agency” means every state office, officer, board, commission, committee, bureau, department and all political subdivisions of the state; and

“Renovation” means revision to a major facility which will affect more than fifty percent (50%) of the gross floor area in the building.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-864; W.S. 1977, §

9-21-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-6-402.
Computation of life-cycle costs.

Life-cycle costs shall be the sum of:

Initial cost;

The reasonably expected fuel costs over the life of the building based on the energy consumption analysis; and

The reasonable costs of maintenance and operation as they pertain to energy systems.

Life-cycle costs shall be computed for two (2) or more alternatives for construction of the facility.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-865; W.S. 1977, § 9-21-102; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-6-403.
Life-cycle cost analyses.

Public agencies shall, prior to the construction or renovation of any major facility, include in the design phase a provision requiring that life-cycle cost analyses be prepared for two (2) or more alternatives for the construction of the facility. These life-cycle cost analyses shall be available to the public. The life-cycle costs shall be a consideration in the selection of a building design by a public agency.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-866; W.S. 1977, § 9-21-103; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to required facilities for handicapped in public building plans and specifications, see §

16-6-501

.

As to required safety devices in public buildings, see §§

27-1-102

and

27-1-103

.